Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.134

Professional services—Deletion from stated purposes of corporation.

A professional corporation may amend its articles of incorporation to delete from its stated purposes the rendering of professional services and to conform to the requirements of Title 23B RCW, or to the requirements of chapter 24.03A RCW if organized pursuant to RCW 18.100.050 as a nonprofit corporation. Upon the effective date of such amendment, the corporation shall no longer be subject to the provisions of this chapter and shall continue in existence as a corporation under Title 23B RCW or chapter 24.03A RCW.

[ 2021 c 176 s 5206; 1991 c 72 s 7; 1986 c 261 s 3; 1983 c 51 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 176: See note following RCW 24.03A.005.